Washington statutes.
RCW 27.15.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Library district" means rural county library district, rural intercounty library district, rural partial-county library district, or island library district.

(2) "Library capital facility area" means a quasi-municipal corporation and independent taxing authority within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution, created by a county legislative authority of one or several counties. A library capital facility area may include all or a portion of a city or town.

(3) "Library capital facilities" includes both real and personal property including, but not limited to, land, buildings, site improvements, equipment, furnishings, collections, and all necessary costs related to acquisition, financing, design, construction, equipping, and remodeling.

[ 1995 c 368 s 2.]